District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3405

Annual payment by the United States — Duties of Mayor and Council; submittal of request to President.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 812, Pub. L. 93-198, title V, § 501
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(a)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3405.
1973 Ed., § 47-2501c.

Effective Dates

Pub. L. 105-33, title XI, § 11721, Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, provided: “Sec. 11721. Effective Date. Except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.”

Editor's Notes

This provision is also codified at § 1-205.01.